Alabama, session 2026rs, HB202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The boundary lines and corporate limits of
the Town of Magnolia Springs in Baldwin County are altered and
rearranged to include within the corporate limits of the
municipality, in addition to the lands now included, all of
the following territory:
Commence at the center of Section 28, Township 7 South,
Range 3 East, St. Stephens Meridian, as shown by map or plat
of Coles Live Oak Park Addition to Magnolia Springs, recorded
in Map Book 1, Page 105, Probate Records, Baldwin County,
Alabama, and run thence North 00 degrees 34 minutes 09 seconds
East, a distance of 50 feet to an iron pin marker for the
POINT OF BEGINNING; thence continue North 00 degrees 34
minutes 09 seconds East, a distance of 1294.09 feet to an iron
pin marker; thence run South 89 degrees 50 minutes 49 seconds
West, a distance of 2666.80 feet; thence run South 00 degrees
04 minutes 04 seconds West, a distance of 1284.4 feet to a
point on the North margin of U.S. Highway No. 98; thence run
South 89 degrees 56 minutes 46 seconds East, along said
Highway, a distance of 2655.46 feet to the Point of Beginning;
SUBJECT TO a right of way easement, over and across, the East
20 feet thereof in use as part of Schindler Lane AND ALSO
SUBJECT TO a 30 foot right of way easement, over and across
the West 30 feet thereof, in use as part of Lipscomb Road.
Page 1

the West 30 feet thereof, in use as part of Lipscomb Road.
HB202 Enrolled
Tract lies in the Northeast Quarter of Section 28, Township 7
South, Range 3 East, Baldwin County, Alabama.
Section 2. In accordance with Section 11-42-6 of the
Code of Alabama 1975, a map showing the proposed territory to
be altered, rearranged, and extended from the Town of Magnolia
Springs is on file and open to public inspection in the Office
of the Judge of Probate in Baldwin County, Alabama.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB202 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 21-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 12-Feb-26 Passed



Page 3